Montana, session 2025, SB404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Department of revenue notification of new construction by local governments and
department of labor and industry. (1) When a local government or the department of labor and industry
issues a building permit or an electrical permit for new construction, the local government or the department of
labor and industry shall send a copy of the building permit or electrical permit through electronic or other means
to the applicable department of revenue field office where the building is located within 1 month 90 days of the
issuance of the permit. The notification must include clear and consistent location information for the parcel in a
format agreed to by the department, which may include an address, geocode, or legal description.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "local government" means any city, town, county, or
consolidated city-county.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
15, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 15, chapter 7, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 404
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 404, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 404
INTRODUCED BY D. FERN
AN ACT REQUIRING THAT CERTAIN BUILDING PERMITS BE SENT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE;
REQUIRING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY TO SEND THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE COPIES OF BUILDING PERMITS IN ORDER TO IDENTIFY NEW
CONSTRUCTION; AND PROVIDING A DEFINITION.”